Utah statutes.
10-8-33.   Railroads -- Tracks and franchises.
They may permit, regulate or prohibit the locating, constructing or laying of
the tracks of any railroad, or tramway in any street, alley or public place;
and may by ordinance grant franchises to railroad and street railroad
companies, and to union railroad depot companies, to lay, maintain and operate
in any street or part or parts of streets or other public places tracks
therefor, but such permission may not be exclusive or for a longer time than
one hundred years.
